Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.056

No bond required on appeal to court.

No bond of any kind shall be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a decision of the director affecting such claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

[ 1984 c 184 s 18; 1971 c 81 s 103; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 21. Formerly RCW 41.26.230.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.